North Dakota statutes. TITLE 12.1 Criminal Code
CHAPTER 12.1-40 Human Trafficking [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 117, § 3]

12.1-40-01.
Human trafficking — Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 139, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 117, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

12.1-40-02.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 139, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 117, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.